Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.468 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on State Highway 3 crossing over Leader Creek O'Flow
in Coal County shall be designated as the "Eldon Hogue Memorial
Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.469 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 183 crossing over Interstate 40 in
Custer County shall be designated as the "Gary Don Rayner, PLS
Memorial Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the
bridge.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.470 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 183 crossing the railroad tracks on
the north side of Clinton in Custer County shall be designated as
the "Representative James E. Covey Bridge". The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.471 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 1486 Page 2

The bridge on State Highway 2 north of Eubanks crossing over the
Kiamichi River in Pushmataha County shall be designated as the
"Harvey Bollinger Sr. Memorial Bridge". The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.472 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of U.S. Highway 271 beginning at the intersection of
East 1900 Road extending northeasterly to the intersection of East
1880 Road in Pushmataha County shall be designated as the "Trooper
Bob Impson Memorial Highway". The Department of Transportation
shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be
placed on the highway.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.473 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 16 beginning at the railroad bridge
in Beggs extending east two (2) miles in Okmulgee County shall be
designated as the "Dawson Sumner Memorial Highway". The Department
of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing
that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.474 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of U.S. Highway 59 on the southeast side of Howe
beginning at the intersection of Old U.S. Highway 59 extending north
to North Railroad Street in LeFlore County shall be designated as
the "SFC Brandon O. Poynter Memorial Highway". The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.475 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on State Highway 99 north of Oilton crossing over the
Cimarron River in Creek County shall be designated as the "Joe
ENR. H. B. NO. 1486 Page 3

Collins Memorial Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall
cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on
the bridge.
SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.476 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge over Polecat Creek on State Highway 101 near Nicut in
Sequoyah County shall be designated as the "Shilah Carrillo Memorial
Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.477 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The flyover bridge on South 9th Avenue over U.S. Highway 69 in
the town of Calera in Bryan County shall be designated as the "PFC
David P. Manners Memorial Bridge". The Department of Transportation
shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be
placed on the bridge.
SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.478 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 69 over East Main Street in the town
of Calera in Bryan County shall be designated as the "LCPL John C.
Reevs Memorial Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall
cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on
the bridge.
SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.479 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 5 west of Temple beginning at the
intersection of N2620 road extending east to the intersection of
N2640 road in Cotton County shall be designated as the "Will Hardin
Memorial Highway". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the
highway.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1486 Page 4

SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.480 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 95 beginning at Four Corners and
extending north for two (2) miles in Texas County shall be
designated as the "Veronica Butler and Jilian Kelley Memorial
Highway". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 14. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.481 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the section of U.S.
Highway 59 beginning one-tenth (1/10) of a mile north of Leisure
Lane extending northwesterly to the intersection of S 590 Road on
the northwest side of Grove in Ottawa County shall be designated as
"The Honorable Rick Littlefield Memorial Highway". The Department
of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing
that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 15. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.482 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 11 in Avant beginning at the
intersection of Old State Highway 11 extending southeasterly two (2)
miles in Osage County shall be designated as the "Don and Shirley
Staires Memorial Highway". The Department of Transportation shall
cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on
the highway.
SECTION 16. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.483 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of U.S. Highway 266 beginning at the intersection of
South 4230 Road extending east to the intersection of South 4250
Road east of Checotah in McIntosh County shall be designated as the
"COP Andy Blizzard and ACOP Justin Durrett Memorial Highway". The
Department of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers
bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1486 Page 5

SECTION 17. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.484 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of U.S. Highway 69 in Calera beginning at Hop's
Crossing extending north one and one-half (1 1/2) miles in Bryan
County shall be designated as the "Senator Roy A. Boatner Memorial
Highway". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 18. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.485 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on State Highway 7 crossing over Guy Sandy Creek in
Murray County shall be designated as the "Monte Duane King, PLS
Memorial Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the
bridge.
SECTION 19. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.486 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 177 crossing over Black Bear Creek
approximately two (2) miles north of U.S. Highway 64 in Noble County
shall be designated as the "Brooks Mittasch Memorial Bridge". The
Department of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers
bearing that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 20. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.487 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 412 crossing over U.S. Highway 69 in
Mayes County shall be designated as the "PFC John Dudley Good
Memorial Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the
bridge.
SECTION 21. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.488 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 1486 Page 6

The section of State Highway 8 beginning at the intersection of
U.S. Highway 64 extending north five (5) miles in Alfalfa County
shall be designated as the "Buddy Murrell Memorial Highway". The
Department of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers
bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 22. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.489 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 77 crossing over Hefner Road in
Oklahoma County shall be designated as the "A. Visanio Johnson
Memorial Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the
bridge.
SECTION 23. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.490 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 51B beginning at the intersection
of South 349th East Avenue extending east to the intersection of
South 365th East Avenue in Wagoner County shall be designated as the
"SGT Ronald G. Castor Purple Heart Recipient Memorial Highway". The
Department of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers
bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 24. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.491 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 150 beginning at the intersection
of North 4150 Road extending southeasterly one and a quarter (1 1/4)
miles in McIntosh County shall be designated as the "Trooper William
"Bill" Walker and Park Superintendent T. Leo Newton Memorial
Highway". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
markers bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 25. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.492 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The interchange of Interstate 35 and East 33rd Street in Edmond,
Oklahoma County shall be designated as the “Ambassador Neal McCaleb
Memorial Interchange”. The Department of Transportation shall cause
ENR. H. B. NO. 1486 Page 7

suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed at the
interchange.
SECTION 26. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.493 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The interchange of Interstate 240 crossing over Sooner Road in
Oklahoma City shall be designated as the "Ted Riley Flatt Memorial
Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
markers bearing that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 27. AMENDATORY Section 15, Chapter 237, O.S.L.
2023 (69 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 1698.412), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1698.412. The section of State Highway 18 beginning at
Black Bear Creek on the north edge of Pawnee extending north to the
intersection of State Highway 15 shall be designated as the "CDR
Ernest "Chief" Evans, First Tribal Recipient of the Medal of Honor,
Recipient Memorial Trail". The Department of Transportation shall
cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on
the highway.
SECTION 28. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 352, O.S.L.
2023 (69 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 1698.429), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1698.429. The bridge crossing over State Highway 102
North on Interstate 40 on State Highway 102 South in Pottawatomie
County shall be designated as "The Honorable Leonard Earl Sullivan
Memorial Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable markers bearing that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 29. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1486 Page 8

Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1486 Page 9